src/fst/stems/adpositions.lexc
LEXICON adpositions
бердланьысь+Adp:берд PO-APR-ELA  "" ; ! матыс петан
бердланьсянь+Adp:берд PO-APR-EGR  "" ; ! матыс ылыстчан
бокланьын+Adp:бок PO-APR-INE  "" ;
бокисянь+Adp:боки PO-EGR  "" ;
бӧрвылысь+Adp:бӧрвы PO-ELA_V/L  "" ;
бӧрын+Adp:бӧр PO-INE  "" ;
бӧрсянь+Adp:бӧр PO-EGR  "" ;
бӧрлань+Adp:бӧр PO-APR  "" ;
бӧрти+Adp:бӧр PO-TRA  "" ;
бӧрӧд+Adp:бӧр PO-PRL  "" ; !only this far in KKO 2000:444
бӧрланьын+Adp:бӧр PO-APR-INE  "" ;
бӧрланьӧ+Adp:бӧр PO-APR-ILL  "" ;
бӧрся+Adp:бӧр PO-COMP  "jälkeen" ;
бӧртинас+Adp:бӧртинас PO-TEMP-IS_TRA-INSTR-SG3  "" ;
бӧрвылӧ+Adp:бӧрвыл PO-ILL  "" ;
бӧрвылысь+Adp:бӧрвы PO-ELA_V/L  "" ;
веркыд+Adp:веркыд POSTP1  "" ;
весьтысь+Adp:весьт PO-ELA  "" ;
весьтын+Adp:весьт PO-INE  "" ;
весьтсянь+Adp:весьт PO-EGR  "" ;
весьтӧдз+Adp:весьт PO-TER  "" ;
водзвылысь+Adp:водзвы PO-ELA_V/L  "" ;
водзӧ+Adp:водз PO-ILL  "" ;
водзті+Adp:водз PO-TRA  "" ;
водзӧд+Adp:водз PO-PRL  "" ;
войдӧр+Adp:войдӧр POSTP1  "" ;
вылысь+Adp:вы PO-ELA_V/L  "" ;
вывсянь+Adp:выв PO-EGR  "" ;
вывлань+Adp:выв PO-APR  "" ;
вывланьӧ+Adp:выв PO-APR-ILL  "" ;
вывланьсянь+Adp:выв PO-APR-EGR  "" ;
выйӧн+Adp:вый PO-INS  "" ;
выя+Adp:выя PO-NOM  "" ;
выяӧ+Adp:выя PO-ILL  "" ;
выяысь+Adp:выя PO-ELA  "" ;
выяӧдз+Adp:выя PO-TER  "" ;
выяті+Adp:выя PO-TRA  "" ;
вӧсна+Adp:вӧсна PO-PX  "takia" ;
горув+Adp:горул PO-SPAT_  "" ;
гырся+Adp:гыр PO-COMP  "" ;
гӧгӧр+Adp:гӧгӧр PO-NOM  "" ;
дінын+Adp:дін PO-INE  "" ;
дінлань+Adp:дін PO-APR  "" ;
дор+Adp:дор PO-NOM  "" ;
дорӧд+Adp:дор PO-PRL  "" ;
дорланьын+Adp:дор PO-APR-INE  "" ;
дорланьысь+Adp:дор PO-APR-ELA  "" ;
дорланьсянь+Adp:дор PO-APR-EGR  "" ;
дырйи+Adp:дырйи PO-PX  "aikana" ;
йылӧ+Adp:йыл PO-ILL  "" ;
йылысь+Adp:йы PO-ELA_V/L  "-stA" ;
йывсянь+Adp:йыл PO-EGR  "" ;
йывлань+Adp:йыл PO-APR  "" ;
йылӧдз+Adp:йыл PO-TER  "" ;
йывті+Adp:йыв PO-TRA  "" ;
йывланьын+Adp:йыв PO-APR-INE  "" ;
йывланьысь+Adp:йыв PO-APR-ELA  "" ;
йывланьсянь+Adp:йыв PO-APR-EGR  "" ;
кабыра+Adp:кабыра PoNTag  "" ;
кежысь+Adp:кеж PO-ELA  "" ;
кодься+Adp:кодься PoATag  "" ;
кузяла+Adp:кузяла POSTP_ "" ;
кымын+Adp:кымын PO-PX  "" ;
мысти+Adp:мысти PO-PX  "kuluttua" ;
мӧдлапӧв+Adp:мӧдлапӧл POSTP1  "" ;
мышкысь+Adp:мыш PO-ELA_0/K  "" ;
мышланьӧ+Adp:мыш PO-APR-ILL  "" ;
ног+Adp:ног POSTP_ "-ttain" ;
нога+Adp:нога PoATag  "" ;
ногӧн+Adp:ног PO-INS  "" ;
ньылыд+Adp:ньылыд POSTP_ "pitkin" ;
ордын+Adp:орд PO-INE  "" ;
ортсыысь+Adp:ортсы PO-ELA  "" ;
паныд+Adp:паныд POSTP_ "vasten" ;
паныдӧн+Adp:паныдӧн POSTP1  "vastapäätä" ;
пасьтала+Adp:пасьтала PO-NOM  "ympäri" ;
пи+Adp:пи POSTP1  "joukossa" ;
пиӧ+Adp:пи PO-ILL  "" ;
пиӧдз+Adp:пи PO-TER  "" ;
помысь+Adp:пом PO-ELA  "" ;
помӧд+Adp:пом PO-PRL  "" ;
помланьысь+Adp:пом PO-APR-ELA  "" ;
помланьӧ+Adp:пом PO-APR-ILL  "" ;
помланьсянь+Adp:пом PO-APR-EGR  "" ;
помланьӧд+Adp:пом PO-APR-PRL  "" ;
помланьӧдз+Adp:пом PO-APR-TER  "" ;
пуд+Adp:пуд PO-PX  "" ;
пуджыд+Adp:пуджыд PO-PX  "" ;
пыдди+Adp:пыдди POSTP_  "asemesta" ;
пырся+Adp:пыр PO-COMP  "" ;
пытшкысь+Adp:пытш PO-ELA_0/K ;
пытшсянь+Adp:пытш PO-EGR ;
пытшлань+Adp:пытш PO-APR ;
пытшті+Adp:пытш PO-TRA ;
пытшланьын+Adp:пытш PO-APR-INE ;
пытшланьысь+Adp:пытш PO-APR-ELA ;
пытшланьӧ+Adp:пытш PO-APR-ILL ;
пӧлӧн+Adp:пӧлӧн PO-NOM "pitkin" ;
пӧлӧн+Adp+Pl:пӧлӧнъяс PO-NOM "pitkin" ;
пӧлӧнӧн+Adp:пӧлӧн PO-INS "" ;
пӧлӧнын+Adp:пӧлӧн PO-INE "" ;
пӧлӧнӧд+Adp+Pl:пӧлӧнъяс PO-PRL "" ;
ради+Adp:ради PO-PX  "" ;
сайысь+Adp:сай PO-ELA  "" ;
сайӧдз+Adp:сай PO-TER  "" ;
сайті+Adp:сай PO-TRA  "" ;
сорӧн+Adp:сор PO-INS  "" ;
суда+Adp:суда POSTP_  "" ;
туйӧ+Adp:туй PO-ILL  "" ;
туйӧн+Adp:туй PO-INS  "" ;
улысь+Adp:у PO-ELA_V/L  "" ;
увсянь+Adp:ув PO-EGR  "" ;
увлань+Adp:ув PO-APR  "" ;
увланьысь+Adp:ув PO-APR-ELA  "" ;
увланьӧ+Adp:ув PO-APR-ILL  "" ;
увланьын+Adp:ув PO-APR-INE  "" ;
увланьті+Adp:ув PO-APR-TRA  "" ;
уліӧд+Adp:улі PO-PRL  "" ;
чӧж+Adp:чӧж POSTP-NOUN  "jnk kuluessa" ;
шӧрын+Adp:шӧр PO-INE  "" ;
шӧрлань+Adp:шӧр PO-APR  "" ;
шӧрӧдз+Adp:шӧр PO-TER  "" ;
шӧрланьысь+Adp:шӧр PO-APR-ELA  "" ;
шӧрланьӧ+Adp:шӧр PO-APR-ILL  "" ;
шӧрвыйланьын+Adp:шӧрвый PO-APR-INE  "" ;
шӧрвыйӧн+Adp:шӧрвый PO-INS  "" ;
ылӧс+Adp:ылӧс POSTP_  "" ;
ылӧс+Adp:ылӧс POSTP1  "" ;
ӧтдор+Adp:ӧтдор POSTP1  "paitsi" ;
